Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.423

Cybersecurity advisory committee and technology services board security subcommittee.

The reports and information, or any portions thereof, that are designated confidential by the cybersecurity advisory committee under RCW 38.52.040(4) and the technology services board security subcommittee under RCW 43.105.291 are confidential and may not be disclosed under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 124 s 4.]